New Jersey, session 221, A2132.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    All public and nonpublic schools, institutions of higher education, and proprietary institutions licensed to offer academic degrees shall provide a graduating student with an option to request that a diploma be conferred by the school or institution listing the students preferred name.  A school or institution shall not require a graduating student to provide legal documentation sufficient to demonstrate a legal name or gender change to permit the student to use a preferred name. A school or institution shall have the right to deny a preferred name request if the preferred name is intended to: a.     misrepresent the persons identity or misappropriate the identity of another person; b.    avoid a legal obligation; c.     harm the reputation or interests of the school or institution; or d.    be derogatory, obscene, or otherwise inappropriate. 2.    a.  A public or nonpublic school, institution of higher education, or proprietary institution licensed to offer degrees shall update a former students records provided that the former student provides sufficient documentation that the former students legal name or gender has been changed.  Documents sufficient to demonstrate a legal name or gender change include, but need not be limit to, the following: (1)   state-issued drivers license; (2)   birth certificate; (3)   passport; (4)   social security card; or (5)   court order indicating a name change, gender change, or both. b.    Upon receipt of proper documentation sufficient to demonstrate a legal name or gender change, a school or institution shall reissue any documents conferred upon the former student with the former students updated legal name or gender.  Documents that shall be reissued by the school or institution upon request include, but need not be limited to, a transcript or diploma conferred by the school or institution.  A school or institution may charge a nominal fee for the reissuance of any document requested by a former student pursuant to this section. 3.    This act shall take effect on the first full day of the third month next following the date of enactment.